Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2409
Person towing vehicle; ascertain owner or tenant of
lot.

Anyone towing a vehicle
pursuant to sections 60-2401 to 60-2411 shall take reasonable steps to ascertain
that the person causing the vehicle
to be towed is the owner or tenant of the lot from which the vehicle is to be towed.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 9.